Arkansas, session 2025, HB1763.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code Title 5, Chapter 18, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
5-18-108. Unlawful use of a communication device during the commission
of a human trafficking offense.
(a)(1) As used in this section, “communication device” means any
public or private instrumentality used or useful in the transmission of a
writing, sign, signal, picture, or sound of any kind.
(2) “Communication device” includes without limitation mail,
telephone, wire, radio, and any other means of communication.
(b) A person commits the offense of unlawful use of a communication
device during the commission of a human trafficking offense if he or she
knowingly uses any communication device in committing or in causing or
facilitating the commission of any act constituting a:
*CEB128*
03/12/2025 11:37:35 AM CEB128

HB1763
(1) Felony under this chapter; or
(2) Felony attempt, solicitation, or conspiracy to commit an
offense under this chapter.
(c) Each use of a communication device is a separate offense under
this section.
(d) Unlawful use of a communication device during the commission of a
human trafficking offense is a Class C felony.





























03/12/2025 11:37:35 AM CEB128